Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 22.1 Uniform Boat Title Act

46-22.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Boat Titling Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-2.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the following words have the meanings indicated:

“Amphibious vehicle” means a vehicle which may be propelled both on water and land.

“Certificate” means any certificate of title issued.

“Dealer” means any person who engages in whole or in part in the business of buying, selling, or exchanging new and unused vessels, or used vessels, or both, either outright or on conditional sale, bailment, lease, chattel mortgage, or otherwise, and who has an established place of business for the sale, trade, and display of vessels. A yacht broker is a dealer.

“Department” means the department of environment management.

“Director” means the director of the department of environmental management.

“Documentation papers” means those papers issued to a documented vessel by the United States Coast Guard or any federal agency successor thereto.

“Documented vessel” means a vessel which has valid documentation papers issued by the United States Coast Guard or any federal agency successor thereto.

“Homemade vessel” means any vessel built after October 31, 1972 for which a federal identification number is not required to be assigned to it by the manufacturer pursuant to federal law, or any vessel constructed or assembled prior to November 1, 1972, by other than a licensed manufacturer for his or her own use or the use of a specific person. In no event shall a rebuilt or reconstructed vessel be construed to be a homemade vessel.

“Lien holder” means a person holding a security interest.

“Manufactured vessel” means any vessel built after October 31, 1972, for which a federal identification number is required pursuant to federal law, or any vessel constructed or assembled prior to November 1, 1972, by a duly licensed manufacturer.

“Manufacturer” means any person engaged in the business of manufacturing or importing new and unused vessels for the purpose of sales or trade.

“Manufacturer’s Statement of Origin, (M.S.O.)” means the original written instrument or document required to be executed and delivered by the manufacturer to his or her agent or a dealer, or a person purchasing a vessel directly from the manufacturer, certifying the origin of the vessel or hull.

“Master Carpenter’s Certificate, (M.C.C.)” means the certificate issued by a carpenter who builds wooden vessels for sale or resale.

“Operating” means to navigate or otherwise use a vessel.

“Operator” means the person who operates or has charge of the navigation or use of a vessel.

“Owner” means a person, other than a lienholder, having a property interest in or title to a vessel. The term includes a person entitled to use or have possession of a vessel subject to an interest in another person, reserved, or created by agreement and securing payment or performance of an obligation, but it does not include a lessee under a lease not intended as security.

“Proceeds” means and includes whatever is received when collateral or proceeds is sold, exchanged, collected, or otherwise disposed of. The term also includes the account arising when the right to payment is earned under a contract right. Money, checks, and the like are cash “proceeds”. All other proceeds are “noncash proceeds”.

“Security interest” means an interest which is reserved or created by an agreement which secures payment or performance of an obligation, and is valid against third parties generally.

“Ship’s lifeboat” means a lifeboat used solely for lifesaving purposes. This term does not include dinghies, tenders, speedboats, or other types of craft, whether or not carried aboard a vessel, where the dinghies, tenders, speedboats, or other types of craft are not used solely for lifesaving purposes.

“State” means the state of Rhode Island.

“State of principal use” means the state on whose waters a vessel is used or to be used most during a calendar year.

“Use” means to operate, navigate, or employ a vessel. A vessel is in use whenever it is upon the water.

“Vessel” means every description of watercraft, other than a seaplane, used or capable of being used as a means of transportation on water.

“Waters of the state” means any water within the jurisdiction of the state, the marginal sea adjacent to the state, and the high seas when navigated as part of a ride or journey to or from the shore of the state.

“Z Hull identification number” means a hull identification number which is assigned to a homemade vessel by the department of environmental management. The number shall consist of twelve (12) characters with the first three (3) characters being the letters “R.I.Z.”, which will identify the hull number as being issued by the state of Rhode Island.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 551, § 1.

46-22.1-3.
Owner’s certificate of title.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e), any owner of a vessel principally used on the waters of this state shall apply to the department for a certificate of title for the vessel.

A certificate of title shall not be required under this chapter for any vessel that is:

A ship’s lifeboat; or

A non-motorized inflatable vessel, surfboard, racing shell, rowing scull, or tender for direct transportation between a vessel and the shore, where the vessel is used solely for direct transportation between a vessel and the shore; or

A documented vessel or vessels fourteen feet (14´) or less.

Each certificate of title shall contain the title number, the name of the vessel manufacturer, model year, hull identification number, the registration number, hull material, propulsion, fuel type, use of vessel length, audit number, as well as name and address of the registered owner, date of issue of the certificate of title, first lien holder, if any, date and amount of lien, second lien holder, if any, date and amount of lien, and any evidence of first and second lien satisfaction with signature and title of agent, as well as notary public seal and any other information as required by the director. Certificates of title shall be issued on forms prescribed by the department.

The department may not issue or renew a certificate of number to any vessel required to be registered and numbered in this state, unless the owner of the vessel has a valid certificate of title.

A person who, on January 1, 1989, is the owner of a vessel with a valid certificate of number issued by this state is not required to file an application for a certificate of title for the vessel until he or she transfers any part of his or her interest in the vessel or renews the certificate of number for the vessel.

Every owner of a vessel subject to titling under the provisions of this chapter shall apply to the department for the issuance of a certificate of title for the vessel within thirty (30) days after taking possession of a vessel. The application shall be on forms the department prescribes, and be accompanied by the required fee. The application shall be signed and sworn to before a notary public and contain a certification signed in writing, representing that statements made on the application are true and correct to the best of the applicant’s knowledge, information, and belief, under penalty of perjury. The application shall contain the date of sale and gross purchase price of the vessel or the fair market value, if no sale immediately proceeded the transfer, and any additional information the department requires. If the application is made for a vessel last previously registered or titled in another state or foreign country, the application shall contain the information set forth above and any other the department may require.

If a dealer buys or acquires a used numbered vessel for resale, he or she shall report the acquisition to the department on forms the department provides, or he or she may apply for and obtain a certificate of title as provided in this chapter. If a dealer buys or acquires a used unnumbered vessel, he or she shall apply for a certificate of title in his or her name within fifteen (15) days. If a dealer buys or acquires a new vessel for resale, he or she may apply for a certificate of title in his or her name, but is not required to do so.

Every dealer transferring a vessel requiring titling under this chapter shall assign the title to the new owner if the dealer is required under subsection (g) to obtain a title, or, in the case of a new vessel, assign the manufacturer’s statement of origin. In the event the dealer accepts an application for title certificate and accompanying fee from the purchaser of a vessel, the dealer shall forward the required fee and application to the department within fifteen (15) days of the receipt of the application and fee.

The department shall maintain a record of any certificate of title it issued.

No person may sell, assign, or transfer a vessel titled by the state without delivering to the purchaser or transferee a certificate of title with an assignment on it showing title in the purchaser or transferee. No person may purchase or otherwise acquire a vessel required to be titled by the state without obtaining a certificate of title for it in his or her name.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 16, § 3.

46-22.1-3.1.
Registration without certificate of title.

If an applicant is unable to provide a valid certificate of title for a vessel required to be titled under the provisions of this chapter then:

As a condition of issuing a certificate of title, the department may accept a surety bond, in an amount equal to the value of the boat, which shall be conditioned to protect the department and all officers and employees of the department, any subsequent purchaser of the boat, any person holding or acquiring a lien or security interest on the boat, and any successor in interest of said purchaser or person, against any loss or damage on account of any defect in or undisclosed claim upon the right, title and interest of the applicant or other person in and to the boat. Any aforementioned interested person shall have a right of action to recover on the bond for any breach of its conditions, but the aggregate liability of the surety to all persons shall not exceed the amount of the bond. The bond shall expire no later than three (3) years after the date it became effective.

In the alternative, an applicant may apply to the superior court for a hearing to determine the title to the vessel. The superior court shall require advertisement once a week for two (2) consecutive weeks in a paper of statewide circulation, and notice by certified mail return receipt requested to: (i) the department of environmental management; and (ii) any and all registered owners, title or lien holders, at their last known address, at least ten (10) days prior to the hearing date, together with any other provisions for notice the court may require. The burden shall be on the applicant to demonstrate ownership of the boat to the court, by a preponderance of the evidence, prior to the issuance of the title. After a hearing, the superior court shall issue an appropriate order. The superior court may order the department to title the vessel in the name of the applicant. Said order issued by the court shall protect the department, all officers and employees of the department, any subsequent purchaser of the boat, any person holding or acquiring a lien or security interest on the boat, and any successor in interest of said purchaser or person against any loss or damage on account of any defect in or undisclosed claim upon the right, title and interest of the applicant or other person in and to the boat.

History of Section.

P.L. 2004, ch. 33, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 61, § 1.

46-22.1-4.
Fees — Duplicates.

The department shall charge a twenty-five ($25.00) fee to issue a certificate of title, and a five dollar ($5.00) fee to transfer a title, or issue a corrected and duplicate certificate of title. A fifteen dollar ($15.00) late fee shall be charged to any owner not timely filing an application for a title certificate under §

46-22.1-3

.

If a certificate of title is lost, stolen, mutilated, destroyed, or becomes illegible, the first lien holder or, if there is none, the owner named in the certificate, as shown by the departments’ records shall, within thirty (30) days, obtain a duplicate by applying to the department. The applicant shall furnish information concerning the original certificate and the circumstances of its loss, disappearance, mutilation, or destruction as the department may require. Mutilated or illegible certificates shall be returned to the department with the application for a duplicate and required fee.

The duplicate certificate of title shall be marked plainly “duplicate” across the face, and may be mailed or delivered to the applicant.

If a lost or stolen original certificate of title for which a duplicate has been issued is recovered, the original shall be surrendered promptly to the department for cancellation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1; P.L. 2004, ch. 595, art. 33, § 9.

46-22.1-5.
Obtaining manufacturer’s or importer’s statement of origin.

A manufacturer or dealer may not transfer ownership of a new vessel without supplying the transferee with the manufacturer’s or importer’s statement of origin signed by the manufacturer’s or importer’s authorized agent. The certificate shall contain such information as the department may require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-6.
Hull identification number of vessel.

Every vessel whose construction began after October 31, 1972 shall have a hull identification number assigned and affixed as required by the federal Boat Safety Act of 1971, 46 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq. The department shall determine the procedures for application and issuance of the hull identification number for homemade boats.

A person may not destroy, remove, alter, cover, deface, or mutilate the manufacturer’s hull identification number, the plate bearing it, or any hull identification number the department assigns to any vessel without the departments’ permission.

A vessel owner who is assigned a “R.I.Z.” hull identification number for his or her homemade boat must permanently affix the number to his or her vessel. He or she shall carve, burn, stamp, emboss, mold, bond, or otherwise permanently affix the number to the exterior starboard side of the transon, and place the number at a second location known only to him or her. The number shall be no less than one-quarter (1/4) of an inch high.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-7.
Dealer’s record of vessels bought, sold, or transferred.

Every dealer shall maintain for three (3) years a record of any vessel he or she bought, sold, exchanged, or received for sale or exchange. These records shall be open to inspection by the department representatives and agents, during reasonable business hours.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-8.
Transfer or repossession of vessel by operation of law.

If ownership of a vessel is transferred by operation of law, such as by inheritance, order in bankruptcy, insolvency, replevin, or execution sale, the transferee, within thirty (30) days after he or she has acquired the right to possession of the vessel by operation of law, shall mail or deliver to the department satisfactory proof of his or her ownership as the department requires together with an application for a new or transfer certificate of title, and the required fee.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-8.1.
Transfer of title by intestate succession.

Unless otherwise provided in the last will and testament of a decedent, any vessel(s) owned by the decedent shall belong, and title to the vessel(s) shall pass, to the surviving spouse.

The assistant director for the department of environmental management shall register the vessel(s) in the name of the surviving spouse upon presentation of the death certificate and registration of the vessel(s) of the decedent to the department of environmental management.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 222, § 1.

46-22.1-9.
Security interest in vessels — Exemptions.

Sections

46-22.1-10

—

46-22.1-17

do not apply to or affect:

A lien given by statute or rule of law to a supplier of services or materials for the vessel;

A lien given by statute to the United States, this state, or any political subdivision of this state;

A security interest in a vessel created by a manufacturer or dealer who holds the vessel for sale, but a buyer in the ordinary course of trade from the manufacturer or dealer takes free of the security interest;

Any lien arising out of an attachment of a vessel;

Any security interest claimed on proceeds, as defined in subdivision (2), if the original security interest did not have to be noted on the certificate of title in order to be perfected; or

Any vessel for which a certificate of title is not required under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-10.
Perfection generally.

Unless excepted by §

46-22.1-9

, a security interest in a vessel is not valid against creditors of the owners or subsequent transferees or secured parties of the vessel unless perfected as provided under §§

46-22.1-10

—

46-22.1-17

.

A security interest is perfected by the delivery to the department of the existing certificate of title, if any, or if there is no certificate of title, an application for certificate of title on a form provided and approved by the department containing information regarding the security interest, and upon payment of a filing fee of fifteen dollars ($15.00).

If a vessel is already subject to a security interest when it is brought into this state, the validity of the security interest in this state is to be determined by the law (including conflict of law rules) of the jurisdiction where the vessel was when the security interest attached, subject to the following:

If the parties to the transaction understood at the time the security interest attached to that the vessel would be kept in this state, and it was brought into this state within thirty (30) days after the security interest attached for a purpose other than transportation through this state, the validity of the security interest in this state is to be determined by the law of this state.

If the security interest was already affected under the laws of the jurisdiction where the vessel was when the security interest attached and before being brought into this state:

If the name of the secured party is shown on an existing certificate of title issued by that jurisdiction or the security interest continues perfected in this state;

If the name of the secured party is not shown on the existing certificate of title issued by that jurisdiction, and if the law of that jurisdiction does not provide for a certificate of title disclosing security interests, the security interest continues perfected in this state for four (4) months, and thereafter, if within the four (4) month period it is perfected in this state. This security interest may also be perfected in this state after the expiration of the four (4) month period in which case perfection dates from the time of perfection in this state; or

If the security interest was not perfected under the law of the jurisdiction in which the vessel was when the security interest attached before being brought into this state, it may be perfected in this state; in which case perfection dates from the time of perfection in this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 182, § 12; P.L. 2000, ch. 420, § 12.

46-22.1-11.
Execution of application — Time when perfected — Endorsement of certificate.

If an owner creates a security interest in a vessel:

The owner immediately shall:

Execute the space provided on the certificate of title or a separate form the department prescribes, naming the secured party on the certificate of title showing the name and address of the secured party, the amount of the security interest, and the date of the security agreement, and

Cause the certificate of title and application to be delivered to the department.

At the time of delivery of the documents described in subdivision (1) of this section to the department, the secured party shall pay to the department a filing fee as required for perfection of the security interest under §

46-22.1-10(b)

.

Upon receipt of the certificate of title, application, and the required filing fee, the department shall endorse on the existing certificate of title or on a new certificate which it then issues, the name and address of all secured parties, and mail or deliver the certificate of title to the secured party.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 182, § 12; P.L. 2000, ch. 420, § 12.

46-22.1-12.
Assignability.

A secured party may assign, absolutely or otherwise, all or part of a security interest in the vessel to a person other than the owner without affecting the interest of the owner or the validity of the security interest, but any person without notice of the assignment is protected in dealing with the secured party as the holder of the security interest, and the secured party remains liable for any obligations as secured party until the assignee is named as secured party on the certificate of title.

The assignee shall deliver to the department the certificate of title if available and an assignment by the secured party named in the certificate of title in the form the department may prescribe, accompanied by a filing fee as required for perfection of the security interest under §

46-22.1-10(b)

. The assignee’s security interest is perfected as of the time of its creation if delivery and payment to the department are completed within ten (10) days of the date of its creation, otherwise perfection is as of the time of its delivery and payment.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-13.
Relief upon satisfaction.

Upon the satisfaction of a security interest in a vessel, the secured party shall securely attach to the certificate of title a release of security interest, in whatever form as may be prescribed by or acceptable to the department and shall within fifteen (15) days mail or deliver the certificate of title with attached release to the owner and a copy of the release to the department. Upon receipt, the department shall update its records to reflect the release. Upon request of the owner and the receipt by the department of the certificate of title with attached release, the department may issue a new certificate of title to the owner upon receipt of a fee of five dollars ($5.00).

If the department determines, after a hearing and following due notice to all interested parties, that an indebtedness does not constitute a security interest, it shall release the indebtedness upon the certificate of title or issue a new certificate of title, and mail or deliver the certificate of title to the owner. Any person aggrieved by the decision of the department may file an appeal in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act, chapter 35 of title 42.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-14.
Adoption of rules and regulations.

The department shall adopt the necessary rules and regulations to implement the provision of §§

46-22.1-3

—

46-22.1-17

. The department shall further adopt the substantive provisions of the federal Boat Safety Act of 1971, 46 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq., as well as the rules and regulations of the Coast Guard concerning hull identification numbers adopted in August of 1984.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-15.
Disclosure of information.

A secured party named in a certificate of title, on written request of the owner, shall disclose to the owner any pertinent information as to the security agreement and indebtedness secured by it in accordance with the commercial laws or articles of the state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-16.
Exclusive method.

The method provided in §§

46-22.1-10

—

46-22.1-16

of perfecting and giving notice of security interest shall be exclusive.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-17.
Forms and investigations.

The department shall prescribe and provide suitable forms of applications, certificate of title, notices of security interest, and all other notices and forms necessary to carry out §§

46-22.1-3

—

46-22.1-17

.

The department may make any investigation it deems necessary to procure information required to carry out §§

46-22.1-3

—

46-22.1-17

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-18.
Offenses relating to this chapter — Penalties.

No person shall operate a vessel on the waters of this state for which a certificate of title is required, without having the certificate of title.

No person shall fail to surrender or otherwise dispose of a vessel for which a certificate of title is required without delivering to the purchaser or transferee a certificate of title, or a manufacturer’s or importer’s statement of origin, or master carpenter’s certificate as required by this chapter.

No person shall fail to surrender to the department any certificate of title upon cancellation of the certificate of title by the department for any valid reason set forth in this chapter or regulations adopted pursuant thereto.

No person shall steal, mutilate, destroy, alter, forge, counterfeit, or falsify any certificate of title or a manufacturer’s statement of origin or importer’s or master carpenter’s certificate to a vessel.

No person shall alter or falsify any assignment of a certificate of title, or an assignment or cancellation of a security interest on a certificate of title to a vessel.

No person shall hold or use a certificate of title to a vessel nor hold assignment or cancellation of a security interest on a certificate of title to a vessel knowing the certificate of title to have been stolen, mutilated, destroyed, altered, forged, counterfeit, or falsified.

No person shall use a false or fictitious name or address, or make any material false statement, or conceal any material fact in an application for a certificate of title, or in a bill of sale or sworn statement.

No person shall procure or attempt to procure a certificate of title to a vessel, or pass or attempt to pass a certificate of title or any assignment thereof to a vessel knowing or having knowledge or having reason to believe that the vessel has been stolen.

No person shall have possession of, buy, receive, sell, or offer for sale, or otherwise dispose of a vessel on which the manufacturer’s or assigned hull identification number has been removed, destroyed, covered, altered, or defaced, knowing of the destruction, removal, covering, alteration or defacement.

No person shall destroy, remove, cover, alter or deface the manufacturer’s or assigned hull identification number on any vessel.

No person shall possess, buy, sell, exchange or give away the certificate of title to a vessel which is abandoned, junked, salvaged, or destroyed.

Any person who applies for a certificate of title for a homemade vessel, and who is assigned a state assigned hull identification number to the vessel shall permanently affix the number in accordance with this chapter and/or regulations under the federal Boat Safety Act of 1971, 46 U.S.C. § 1451 et seq. Failure of the vessel owner to affix the state assigned hull number to his or her vessel shall be a violation of this chapter.

Penalties. Any person convicted of violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and subject to a fine of up to five hundred dollars ($500), and/or a sentence of one year imprisonment, or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.

46-22.1-19.
Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or of any rule, regulation, or order made thereunder, or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid by a court of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of this chapter, rule, regulation, or order, and the application of the provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected thereby. The invalidity of any section or sections or parts of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the validity of the remainder of this chapter, and it is hereby declared to be the legislative intent that this chapter would have been enacted if the parts had not been included therein.

History of Section.

P.L. 1988, ch. 555, § 1.